California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
  ARTICLE 3. Common Trust Funds [17671. - 17677.]

17671.

Section 584 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to common trust funds, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 45.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17677.

Every trust company operating a common trust fund shall make a return under penalties of perjury for each taxable year, stating specifically with respect to such fund the items of gross income and the deductions allowed by this article and shall include in the return information sufficient to identify the trusts and estates entitled to share in the taxable income of the common trust fund and the amount of the proportionate share of each such participant.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 48.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Natural Resources [17681. - 17681.]

17681.

(a) Subchapter I of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to natural resources, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, Section 613(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, in the case of oil shale, shall not apply.

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, Section 613(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to 10 percent, in the case of coal, shall not apply.

(d) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, Section 613A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on percentage depletion in the case of oil and gas wells, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 24.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Estates, Trusts, Beneficiaries, and Decedents [17731. - 17779.]

17731.

(a) Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to estates, trusts, beneficiaries, and decedents, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 692(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the ten thousand-dollar ($10,000) minimum benefit, does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 37.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17731.5.

(a) Section 641(c)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read: “The amount of the tax imposed by subdivision (e) of Section 17041 shall be determined by using the highest rate of tax applicable to an individual under subdivision (a) of Section 17041.”

(b) Section 641(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read: “The credit allowed under subdivision (b) of Section 17733 shall be zero.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 26.   Effective May 8, 2002.   Applicable as prescribed by Sec. 63 of Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

17732.

Section 642(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deduction for personal exemption, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 46.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17733.

(a) An estate shall be allowed a credit of ten dollars ($10) against the tax imposed under Section 17041, less any amounts imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), or both, of Section 17560.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a trust shall be allowed a credit of one dollar ($1) against the tax imposed under Section 17041, less any amounts imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (e), or both, of Section 17560.

(2) (A) A disability trust, as defined in Section 642(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be allowed a credit in an amount equal to the personal exemption credit authorized for a single individual pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17054.

(B) The credit authorized by subparagraph (A) shall be subject to the credit reduction provisions of Section 17054.1. For purposes of making the adjustments required by Section 17054.1, the adjusted gross income of the disability trust shall be computed in accordance with Section 67(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to determination of adjusted gross income in case of estates and trusts.

(C) This paragraph applies to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

(c) The credits allowed by this section shall be in lieu of the credits allowed under Section 17054 (relating to credit for personal exemption).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 37.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17734.

For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, in the case of a nonresident beneficiary, income and deduction derived through an estate or trust shall be included in that computation only to the extent that the income or deduction is derived by the estate or trust from sources within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17734.6.

Section 646 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of electing Alaska Native Settlement Trusts, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 37.6.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17736.

(a) Section 642(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified for purposes of this part by substituting “December 31, 1970” for “October 9, 1969” throughout that paragraph.

(b) In the case of a trust, the deduction allowed by Section 642(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is subject to Section 681 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on
 charitable deduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 195.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17737.

(a) For purposes of computing the taxable income of the estate or trust and the taxable income of a spouse to whom Section 682(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to income of an estate or trust in the case of divorce, etc., as it read on January 1, 2015, applies, that spouse shall be considered as the beneficiary for purposes of this chapter.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply for any divorce or separation instrument executed after December 31, 2025, or for any divorce or separation instrument executed on or before December 31, 2025, and modified after that date, if the modification expressly provides that the amendments made by this subdivision apply to such modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 26.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17742.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the income of an estate or trust is taxable to the estate or trust. The tax applies to the entire taxable income of an estate, if the decedent was a resident, regardless of the residence of the fiduciary or beneficiary, and to the entire taxable income of a trust, if the fiduciary or beneficiary (other than a beneficiary whose interest in such trust is contingent) is a resident, regardless of the residence of the settlor.

(b) For purposes of this article the residence of a corporate fiduciary
 of a trust means the place where the corporation transacts the major portion of its administration of the trust.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 59.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17743.

Where the taxability of income under this chapter depends on the residence of the fiduciary and there are two or more fiduciaries for the trust, the income taxable under Section 17742 shall be apportioned according to the number of fiduciaries resident in this state pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 59.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17744.

Where the taxability of income under this chapter depends on the residence of the beneficiary and there are two or more beneficiaries of the trust, the income taxable under Section 17742 shall be apportioned according to the number and interest of beneficiaries resident in this state pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 59.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17745.

(a) If, for any reason, the taxes imposed on income of a trust which is taxable to the trust because the fiduciary or beneficiary is a resident of this state are not paid when due and remain unpaid when that income is distributable to the beneficiary, or in case the income is distributable to the beneficiary before the taxes are due, if the taxes are not paid when due, such income shall be taxable to the beneficiary when distributable to him except that in the case of a nonresident beneficiary such income shall be taxable only to the extent it is derived from sources within this state.

(b) If no taxes have been paid on the current or accumulated income of the trust because the resident beneficiary’s interest in the trust was contingent such income shall be taxable to the beneficiary when distributed or distributable to him or her.

(c) The tax on that income which is taxable to the beneficiary under subdivisions (a) or (b) is a tax on the receipt of that income distributed or on the constructive receipt of that distributable income. For purposes of this section income accumulated by a trust continues to be income even though the trust provides that the income (ordinary or capital) shall become a part of the corpus.

(d) The tax attributable to the inclusion of that income in the gross income of that beneficiary for the year that income is distributed or distributable under subdivision (b) shall be the
 aggregate of the taxes which would have been attributable to that income had it been included in the gross income of that beneficiary ratably for the year of distribution and the five preceding taxable years, or for the period that the trust accumulated or acquired income for that contingent beneficiary, whichever period is the shorter.

(e) In the event that a person is a resident beneficiary during the period of accumulation, and leaves this state within 12 months prior to the date of distribution of accumulated income and returns to the state within 12 months after distribution, it shall be presumed that the beneficiary continued to be a resident of this state throughout the time of distribution.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe such regulations as it deems necessary for the application of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 59.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17745.1.

The amendments of Sections 17742 and 17745 made at the 1963 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be applicable only with respect to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1962. Whether or not the income of a trust which is or was accumulated or is or was accumulated and distributed or accumulated and distributable is taxable by California for the years prior to 1963 shall be determined as if Sections 17742 and 17745 had not been amended at the 1963 Regular Session of the Legislature and without inferences drawn from the fact that such amendments were not made applicable with respect to taxable years beginning before
 January 1, 1963.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 59.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17751.

Section 645 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain revocable trusts treated as part of estate, is modified as follows:

(a) An election under Section 645(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes shall be treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the executor, if any, of the estate and the trustee of the qualified revocable trust under Section 645(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e)
 of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed.

(b) If the executor, if any, of the estate and the trustee of a qualified revocable trust fail to make an election under Section 645(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes with respect to that qualified revocable trust, that trust shall be treated and taxed for purposes of this part as a separate trust, an election under Section 645(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes with respect to that trust shall not be allowed, and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed with respect to that trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 27.   Effective May 8, 2002.   Applicable as prescribed by Sec. 64 of Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

17752.

Section 663 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules applicable to Sections 661 and 662, is modified as follows:

(a) Section 663(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions in the first 65 days of the taxable year, is modified as follows:

(1) An election under Section 663(b) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes shall be treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the executor of
 the estate or the fiduciary of the trust, as the case may be, under Section 663(b) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed.

(2) If the executor of the estate or the fiduciary of the trust, as the case may be, fails to make an election under Section 663(b) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes with respect to an amount properly paid or credited within 65 days of the taxable year, that amount shall not be considered for purposes of this part as having been paid or credited on the last day of the preceding taxable year, an election under Section 663(b) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes with respect to that amount shall not be allowed, and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed with respect to that amount.

(b) Section 663(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to separate shares treated as separate estates or trusts, is modified as follows:

(1) An election under Section 663(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes shall be treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the executor of the estate or the fiduciary of the trust, as the case may be, under Section 663(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed.

(2) If the executor of the estate or the fiduciary of the trust, as the case may be, fails to make an election under Section 663(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes with respect to separate shares treated as separate estates or trusts, an election under Section 663(c) of
 the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes shall not be allowed, and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 34.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17755.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, Section 664(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to excise tax, shall not apply and, in lieu thereof, the unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 23732, of every charitable remainder annuity trust or charitable remainder unitrust shall be subject to tax under Section 17651.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 478, Sec. 4.   (AB 2754)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17760.

Section 684 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recognition of gain on certain transfers to certain foreign trusts and estates, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 38.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17760.5.

Section 685 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of funeral trusts, is modified as follows:

(a) Section 685(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read: In the case of a qualified funeral trust—

(1) Subparts B, C, D, and E of Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(2) No credit for personal
 exemption shall be allowed under Section 17054 or Section 17733.

(b) Section 685(b) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows: 

(1) An election under Section 685(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes shall be treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the trustee of the qualified funeral trust under Section 685(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed.

(2) If the trustee of a qualified funeral trust fails to make an election under Section 685(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes with respect to a qualified funeral trust, that trust shall be treated for purposes of this part as owned under Subpart E of the Internal Revenue Code by the
 purchasers of the contracts described in Section 685(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, an election under Section 685(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes with respect to that trust shall not be allowed, and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 shall not be allowed with respect to that trust.

(c) Section 685(d) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read: Subdivision (e) of Section 17041 shall be applied to each qualified funeral trust by treating each beneficiary’s interest in each qualified funeral trust as a separate trust.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board may, by forms and instructions, provide rules for simplified reporting of all trusts having a single trustee consistent with the rules prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 685 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) This section shall apply to taxable years ending after August 5, 1997.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 7) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 35.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17779.

Sections 665 to 668, inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to distributions described in subdivision (b) of Section 17745.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 59.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Partners and Partnerships [17851. - 17859.]

17851.

Subchapter K of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to partners and partnerships, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 47.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17851.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 701 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to partners, not partnerships, subject to tax, a partnership, as an entity shall be subject to Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 17935), relating to tax on limited partnerships, Chapter 10.6 (commencing with Section 17941), relating to tax on limited liability companies, and Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 17948), relating to tax on limited
 liability partnerships.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 234.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17853.

Section 703(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to additionally provide that the deduction for taxes provided in Section 164(a) of the Internal Revenue Code with respect to taxes, described in Section 18006, paid to another state shall not be allowed to the partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 49.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17854.

For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, in the case of a nonresident partner, guaranteed payments, as defined by Section 707(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be included in that computation as gross income from sources within this state in the same manner as if those payments were a distributive share of that partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17855.

The term “unrealized receivables,” as defined by Section 751(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not include any of the following:

(a) Stock in certain foreign corporations, as described in Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Oil, gas, or geothermal property, described in Section 1254 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 61.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17856.

Section 751(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to appreciated inventory items subject to tax as a gain on foreign investment company stock, does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17857.

Section 751(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the limitation on tax attributable to deemed sales of Section 1248 stock, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 50.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17858.

For purposes of this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), any election relating to the computation of depreciation shall be made by the partnership and each partner shall take into account his or her distributive share of the depreciation amount computed in accordance with that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1295, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17859.

(a) The amendments made by Section 13504 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 708 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the continuation of a partnership, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The amendments made by Section 13504 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 743(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative rules for electing investment
 partnerships, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(c) The amendments made by Section 13504 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 168(i)(7)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to transactions covered, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(d) (1) A partnership may elect to have subdivision (a) apply to partnership taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, in which case subdivisions (b) and (c) shall also apply to the election.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall specify the form and manner in which the election under paragraph (1) shall be made, as well as whether an amended return or any other information shall be required.

(3) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, procedure, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to paragraph (2).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 16.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Tax on Limited Partnerships [17935. - 17937.]

17935.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (f), for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, every limited partnership doing business in this state (as defined by Section 23101) and required to file a return under Section 18633 shall pay annually to this state a tax for the privilege of doing business in this state in an amount equal to the applicable amount specified in Section 23153.

(b) (1) In addition to any limited partnership that is doing business in this state and therefore is subject to the tax imposed by subdivision (a), for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, every limited partnership that has executed, acknowledged, and filed a certificate of limited partnership with the Secretary of State
 pursuant to Section 15621 or 15902.01 of the Corporations Code, and every foreign limited partnership that has registered with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15692 or 15909.01 of the Corporations Code, shall pay annually the tax prescribed in subdivision (a). The tax shall be paid for each taxable year, or part thereof, until a certificate of cancellation is filed on behalf of the limited partnership with the office of the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15623, 15696, 15902.03, or 15909.07 of the Corporations Code.

(2) If a taxpayer files a return with the Franchise Tax Board that is designated its final return, that board shall notify the taxpayer that the tax imposed by this chapter is due annually until a certificate of cancellation is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15623, 15696, 15902.03, or 15909.07 of the Corporations Code.

(c) The
 tax imposed by this chapter shall be due and payable on the date the return is required to be filed under former Section 18432 or 18633.

(d) For purposes of this section, “limited partnership” means any partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of this state or any other jurisdiction and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any limited partnership that ceased doing business prior to January 1, 1997, filed a final return with the Franchise Tax Board for a taxable year ending before January 1, 1997, and filed a certificate of dissolution with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15623 of the Corporations Code prior to January 1, 1997, shall not be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter for any period following the date the certificate of dissolution was filed with the Secretary of State,
 but only if the limited partnership files a certificate of cancellation with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15623 of the Corporations Code. In the case where a notice of proposed deficiency assessment of tax or a notice of tax due (whichever is applicable) is mailed after January 1, 2001, the first sentence of this subdivision shall not apply unless the certificate of cancellation is filed with the Secretary of State not later than 60 days after the date of the mailing of the notice.

(f) (1) (A) Every limited partnership doing business in this state as described in subdivision (a) that files a certificate of limited partnership or registers with the Secretary of the State pursuant to subdivision (b) on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the
 tax imposed under this section for its first taxable year.

(B) This subdivision shall become operative only for a taxable year in which any budget measure appropriates one dollar ($1) or more to the Franchise Tax Board for the costs associated with administration of this subdivision.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2030, every limited partnership required to file a return under Section 18633 shall, instead of the amount specified in Section 23153, pay the annual tax to this state in the amount of four hundred dollars ($400) for its first taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 25.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17936.

A limited partnership shall not be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter if the limited partnership did no business in this state during the taxable year and the taxable year was 15 days or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 604, Sec. 10.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17937.

(a) A limited partnership shall not be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter for a taxable year if the limited partnership does all of the following:

(1) Files with the Franchise Tax Board a timely final annual tax return for the preceding taxable year.

(2) Does not do business in this state after the end of the taxable year for which the final annual tax return was filed.

(3) Files a certificate of cancellation with the Secretary of State, pursuant to Section 15623 or 15696 of the Corporations Code, before the end of the 12-month period beginning with the date the final annual tax return was filed.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “final annual tax return” is a return described in Section 18633 that is filed on or before the due date of the return, as extended, that the taxpayer designates in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board as the taxpayer’s final annual return for purposes of the tax imposed under this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, a “final annual tax return” is a return filed pursuant to Section 18633 where the taxpayer is not required to file a subsequent return to reflect the imposition of tax under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 49.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.6. Tax and Fees on Limited Liability Companies [17941. - 17947.]

17941.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (g), for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, a limited liability company doing business in this state (as defined in Section 23101) shall pay annually to this state a tax for the privilege of doing business in this state in an amount equal to the applicable amount specified in subdivision (d) of Section 23153 for the taxable year.

(b) (1) In addition to any limited liability company that is doing business in this state and is therefore subject to the tax imposed by subdivision (a), for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, a limited liability company shall pay annually the tax prescribed in subdivision (a) if articles of organization have been accepted, or a
 certificate of registration has been issued, by the office of the Secretary of State. The tax shall be paid for each taxable year, or part thereof, until a certificate of cancellation of registration or of articles of organization is filed on behalf of the limited liability company with the office of the Secretary of State.

(2) If a taxpayer files a return with the Franchise Tax Board that is designated as its final return, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify the taxpayer that the annual tax shall continue to be due annually until a certificate of dissolution is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 17707.08 of the Corporations Code or a certificate of cancellation is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 17708.06 of the Corporations Code.

(c) The tax assessed under this section shall be due and payable on or before the 15th day of the fourth month
 of the taxable year.

(d) For purposes of this section, “limited liability company” means an organization, other than a limited liability company that is exempt from the tax and fees imposed under this chapter pursuant to Section 23701h or Section 23701x, that is formed by one or more persons under the law of this state, any other country, or any other state, as a “limited liability company” and that is not taxable as a corporation for California tax purposes.

(e) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, if the office of the Secretary of State files a certificate of cancellation pursuant to Section 17707.02 of the Corporations Code for any limited liability company, then paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 23153 shall apply to that limited liability company as if the limited liability company were properly treated as a corporation for that limited purpose
 only, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 23153 shall not apply. Nothing in this subdivision entitles a limited liability company to receive a reimbursement for any annual taxes or fees already paid.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, a limited liability company that is a small business solely owned by a deployed member of the United States Armed Forces shall not be subject to the tax imposed under this section for any taxable year the owner is deployed and the limited liability company operates at a loss or ceases operation.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may promulgate regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this subdivision, including a definition for “ceases operation.”

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, all of the following definitions apply:

(A) “Deployed” means being called to active duty or active service during a period when a Presidential Executive order specifies that the United States is engaged in combat or homeland defense. “Deployed” does not include either of the following:

(i) Temporary duty for the sole purpose of training or processing.

(ii) A permanent change of station.

(B) “Operates at a loss” means a limited liability company’s expenses exceed its receipts.

(C) “Small business” means a limited liability company with total income from all sources derived from, or
 attributable to, the state of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less.

(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2030.

(g) (1) (A) Every limited liability company doing business in this state as described in subdivision (a) that organizes or registers with the Secretary of the State pursuant to subdivision (b) on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the tax imposed under this section for its first taxable year.

(B) This subdivision shall become operative only for a taxable year in which any budget measure appropriates one dollar ($1) or more to the Franchise Tax Board for the costs associated with administration of this subdivision.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2030, every limited liability company required to file a return under Section 18633.5 shall, instead of the amount specified in Section 23153, pay the annual tax to this state in the amount of four hundred dollars ($400) for its first taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 7.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17942.

(a) In addition to the tax imposed under Section 17941, every limited liability company subject to tax under Section 17941 shall pay annually to this state a fee equal to:

(1) Nine hundred dollars ($900), if the total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state for the taxable year is two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, but less than five hundred thousand
 dollars ($500,000).

(2) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), if the total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state for the taxable year is five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more, but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) Six thousand dollars ($6,000), if the total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state for the taxable year is one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, but less than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(4) Eleven thousand seven hundred ninety dollars ($11,790), if the total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state for the taxable year is five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more.

(b) (1) (A) For purposes of this section, “total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state” means gross income, as defined in Section 24271, plus the cost of goods sold that are paid or incurred in connection with the trade or business of the taxpayer. However, “total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state” shall not include allocation or attribution of income or gain or distributions made to a limited liability company in its capacity as a member of, or holder of an economic interest in, another limited liability company if the allocation or attribution of income or gain or distributions are directly or indirectly attributable to income that is subject to the payment of the fee described in this section.

(B) For purposes of this section, “total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state” shall be determined using the rules for assigning sales under Sections 25135
 and 25136 and the regulations thereunder, as modified by regulations under Section 25137, other than those provisions that exclude receipts from the sales factor.

(2) In the event a taxpayer is a commonly controlled limited liability company, the total income from all sources derived from or attributable to this state, taking into account any election under Section 25110, may be determined by the Franchise Tax Board to be the total income of all the commonly controlled limited liability company members if it determines that multiple limited liability companies were formed for the primary purpose of reducing fees payable under this section. A determination by the Franchise Tax Board under this subdivision may only be made with respect to one limited liability company in a commonly controlled group. However, each commonly controlled limited liability company shall be jointly and severally liable for the fee. For purposes of this section, commonly
 controlled limited liability companies shall include the taxpayer and any other partnership or limited liability company doing business (as defined in Section 23101) in this state and required to file a return under Section 18633 or 18633.5, in which the same persons own, directly or indirectly, more than 50 percent of the capital interests or profits interests.

(c) The fee assessed under this section shall be due and payable on the date the return of the limited liability company is required to be filed under Section 18633.5, shall be collected and refunded in the same manner as the taxes imposed by this part, and shall be subject to interest and applicable penalties.

(d) (1) The fee imposed by this section shall be estimated and paid on or before the 15th day of the sixth month of the current taxable year.

(2) A penalty of 10 percent of the amount of any underpayment shall be added to the fee. The underpayment amount shall be equal to the difference between the total amount of the fee imposed by this section for the taxable year less the amount paid under paragraph (1) by the date specified in that paragraph. A penalty shall not be imposed with respect to any fee estimated and paid under this section if the amount paid by the date prescribed in this subdivision is equal to or greater than the total amount of the fee of the limited liability company for the preceding taxable year.
